Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 7. Settlement of Accounts

§ 2921.
Accounts, time.

Within one year after his or her appointment and annually thereafter and at such other times as the Probate Division of the Superior Court directs, a guardian whose ward has real or personal estate shall render and settle with the court an account of the proceeds and expenditure of his or her ward’s estate.
At the expiration of his or her trust, such guardian shall render and settle with the Probate Division of the Superior Court his or her account of the property of his or her ward, including the income and proceeds of the sale of his or her personal and real estate, and pay over and deliver to persons entitled to the same the estate and effects remaining in his or her hands, or due from him or her on such settlements.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2922.
By guardian of nonresident ward.

When a minor or other person has a guardian in this State, but resides in another state or country, and it is shown to the court that such minor or other person has a guardian in the state or country where he or she resides, and that such guardian, by bond or otherwise, has given satisfactory security for the faithful performance of his or her trust, the court may order the first named guardian to settle his or her account and pay over the estate of his or her ward to the nonresident guardian, if it appears to the court that such transfer will be for the interests of the ward.

§ 2923.
Property may be ordered into hands of nonresident guardian; proceedings.

When a guardian and ward are nonresidents and the ward is entitled to property in this State, the guardian may petition the Probate Division of the Superior Court for removal of the property. The petition shall set forth that the removal of the property of the ward will not conflict with the terms and limitations of the right by which the ward owns the same nor be prejudicial to the ward’s interests therein. The petition shall be accompanied by a complete transcript from the records of a court of competent jurisdiction of the state in which the guardian and ward reside, duly exemplified or authenticated, showing appointment as guardian of the ward and that, by bond or otherwise, satisfactory security has been given for the faithful execution of the trust.

The transcript shall be filed in the court, and the guardian shall thereupon be entitled to receive letters or a certificate of guardianship of the estate of the ward from the court, which shall authorize the guardian to demand, sue for, and recover property and remove the same to the other state.

The court may order a resident guardian, executor, or administrator, having any of the estate of the ward, to deliver the same to the nonresident guardian, provided that all debts in favor of residents or citizens of this State, known to exist against the estate, whether due or to become due, have first been paid or tendered.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 142;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2924.
Same; exception.

Section 2923 of this title shall not apply if the parent of the ward, being a resident of this State at the time of death, has appointed a guardian for the ward by last will and testament and the guardian resides in this State at the time the petition provided for in section 2923 is made, unless the consent of the testamentary guardian to the removal of the property is satisfactorily shown to the Probate Division of the Superior Court to which the petition is made.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 143;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2925.
Guardian to swear to correctness of account.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall examine every guardian upon oath as to the truth and correctness of an account before the same is allowed by the court.
However, in its discretion, the court may dispense with such examination when objection is not made to the allowance of the account.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 144;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2926.
Surety may intervene as party; rights of surety.

Upon the settlement of a guardian’s account, any person interested as surety in respect to the account may intervene as a party to the accounting with the same rights as the surety of an administrator in like cases.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 145.

§ 2927.
Remedy, after guardian’s discharge, reexamination of accounts.

After the trust of a guardian is terminated, if the ward or the ward’s legal representatives are dissatisfied with the account as allowed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court during the continuance of the trust, within two years, and if the ward or the legal representatives do not at the time of the termination of the trust reside in this State, within four years thereafter, they may file a motion to reopen the estate for a reexamination of the account. After notice as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure, the court shall reexamine accounts previously allowed. A party may appeal from the decision of the Probate Division to the Civil Division of the Superior Court. The final allowance of accounts in these proceedings shall be conclusive between the parties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 146;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 124, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2928.
Death of ward.

Whenever a person dies while under guardianship, the guardian may pay so much of the burial expenses as the guardian is able from the funds in his or her hands and make final account to the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 147;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.